Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska85-308.01
State colleges; degree of bachelor of arts or bachelor of science; confer.

The board shall have power, on the recommendation of the faculty of the respective college, to confer, upon completion of a four-year course in liberal arts prescribed by such board, a degree of bachelor of arts or bachelor of science.

Laws 1949, c. 315, § 2(2), p. 1036;

Laws 1965, c. 579, § 1, p. 1870.